New York, session 2025-2026, A3204.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "emergency school relief act of 2026". 3 § 2. Paragraphs 3 and 4 of subdivision a of section 1612 of the tax 4 law, paragraph 3 as amended by chapter 174 of the laws of 2013 and para- 5 graph 4 as amended by section 1 of part BB of chapter 59 of the laws of 6 2021, are amended to read as follows: 7 (3) [fifty-five] forty percent of the total amount for which tickets 8 have been sold for any joint, multi-jurisdiction, and out-of-state 9 lottery except as otherwise provided in paragraph one of subdivision b 10 of this section for any joint, multi-jurisdiction, out-of-state video 11 lottery gaming; or 12 (4) [fifty] thirty-five percent of the total amount for which tickets 13 have been sold for games known as: (A) the "Daily Numbers Game" or "Win 14 4", discrete games in which the participants select no more than three 15 or four of their own numbers to match with three or four numbers drawn 16 by the commission for purposes of determining winners of such games, (B) 17 "Pick 10", offered no more than twice daily, in which participants 18 select from a specified field of numbers a subset of ten numbers to 19 match against a subset of numbers to be drawn by the commission from 20 such field of numbers for the purpose of determining winners of such 21 game, (C) "Take 5", offered no more than twice daily, in which partic- 22 ipants select from a specified field of numbers a subset of five numbers EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06210-02-6 A. 3204--A 2 1 to match against a subset of five numbers to be drawn by the commission 2 from such field of numbers for purposes of determining winners of such 3 game; or 4 § 3. The opening paragraph of paragraph 1 of subdivision b of section 5 1612 of the tax law, as amended by section 2 of subpart D of part DD of 6 chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 7 Notwithstanding section one hundred twenty-one of the state finance 8 law, on or before the twentieth day of each month, the commission shall 9 pay into the state treasury, to the credit of the state lottery fund 10 created by section ninety-two-c of the state finance law, not less than 11 forty-five percent of the total amount for which tickets have been sold 12 for games defined in paragraph five of subdivision a of this section 13 during the preceding month, not less than [forty-five] sixty percent of 14 the total amount for which tickets have [be] been sold for games defined 15 in paragraph four of subdivision a of this section during the preceding 16 month, not less than [thirty-five] fifty percent of the total amount for 17 which tickets have been sold for games defined in paragraph three of 18 subdivision a of this section during the preceding month, not less than 19 twenty and three-fourths percent of the total amount for which tickets 20 have been sold for games defined in paragraph two of subdivision a of 21 this section during the preceding month, provided however that for games 22 with a prize payout of seventy-four and one-fourth percent of the total 23 amount for which tickets have been sold, the commission shall pay not 24 less than ten and three-fourths percent of sales into the state treasury 25 and not less than twenty-five percent of the total amount for which 26 tickets have been sold for games defined in paragraph one of subdivision 27 a of this section during the preceding month; and the balance of the 28 total revenue after payout for prizes for games known as "video lottery 29 gaming," including any joint, multi-jurisdiction, and out-of-state video 30 lottery gaming, 31 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.